Hawaii, session 2026, SB891.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: Section 1.  (a) There is established a tourism and gaming working group within the department of business, economic development, and tourism for administrative purposes. (b)  The working group shall: (1)  Review past gaming legislation that has been considered by the legislature to determine if any have the potential to be implemented in the State; (2)  Develop a comprehensive tourism gaming policy framework that would serve as a catalyst for economic activity, employment, investment, and a significant source of tax revenue for the State; (3)  Examine the potential for gaming activities at the New Aloha Stadium Entertainment District; (4)  Examine how gaming activities may support the work being done by the department of business, economic development, and tourism and the Hawaii tourism authority; (5)  Examine strategies to mitigate addiction and other health hazards associated with gambling; and (6)  Examine strategies to mitigate the financial harms associated with gambling. (c)  The working group shall consist of the following individuals: (1)  The chairs of the senate and house of representatives standing committees with primary subject matter purview over economic development, or the chairs' designees, who shall serve as co‑chairpersons of the working group; (2)  The president of the senate, or the president's designee; (3)  The speaker of the house of representatives, or the speaker's designee; (4)  A representative from the department of business, economic development, and tourism; (5)  A representative from the department of law enforcement; (6)  A representative from the department of taxation; and (7)  A representative from the Hawaii tourism authority. (d) The co-chairpersons of the working group shall invite the following individuals to serve as members of the working group: (1)  One individual from the Aiea Community Association; (2)  One individual from Aloha Halawa District Partners; (3)  Three individuals from the gaming or gambling industry; (4)  Two individuals representing Native Hawaiian culture; (5)  Two individuals with social services experience dealing with behavioral addictions; (6)  One individual who is a health care professional; (7)  One individual representing labor unions; and (8)  Other interested parties with relevant experience and expertise, as invited by the co-chairpersons of the working group. (e) The members of the working group shall serve without compensation; provided that members who are employees of the State and members who do not represent for-profit gaming organizations shall be reimbursed for expenses, including travel expenses, necessary for the performance of their duties. (f) The working group shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation, to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2026. (g) The department of business, economic development, and tourism shall provide necessary administrative support to the working group in carrying out its duties, including preparation of the report required pursuant to subsection (e). (h) The working group shall be dissolved on June 30, 2026. SECTION 2.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.